include/feats/currency.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2026  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# proposal: Currency support with documentation. English version.
# Author: Matthew C.
# Currencies and formats.
# Those are already definned in our format set.
source include/formats.foma

# Parsing the currency using tags:

define Singular 
# if zero cents, remove it. Dollar only:
[%, %0^2] -> 0 || [dollar|eur] UnformattedNumber _ .#. ; 

define TagCurrency 
# First part: dollars and euros handling, singular and plural.
# if $0, remove it. Cents only.
[[dollar|eur] %0 %,] @-> 0 || .#. _ ,, 
# Ds1: dollar, in singular.
[..] -> ds1 || dollar 1 _ %, , .#. dollar 1 _ .#. ,, 
# dp1: dollars, in plural.
[..] -> dp1 || dollar [UnformattedNumber - 1|%0] _ %, , .#. dollar [UnformattedNumber - 1|%0] _ .#. ,, 
# ds2: eur, in singular.
[..] -> ds2 || eur 1 _ %, , .#. eur 1 _ .#. ,, 
# dp2: eurs, in plural
[..] -> dp2 || eur [UnformattedNumber - 1|%0] _ %, , .#. eur [UnformattedNumber - 1|%0] _ .#. ,, 
# with: complement, which means and, with, etc, or empty.
%, -> ... with || [dollar|eur] DollarFormat _ CentFormat ,, 
# second part: cents handling, singular and plural.
# cs1: cent, in singular, for dollar(s).
[%0 1] -> ... cs1 || dollar DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cs2: cent, in singular, for euro(s).
[%0 1] -> ... cs2 || eur DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cp1: cents, in plural, for dollar(s).
[CentFormat - [%0 1]] -> ... cp1 || dollar DollarFormat %, _ .#. ,, 
# cp2: cents, in plural, for euro(s).
[CentFormat - [%0 1]] -> ... cp2 || eur DollarFormat %, _ .#. ; 

define TranslateCurrency 
# Translators, please take care of this:
# English: singular number:
# A single dollar or euro.
1 -> jeden || _ [ds1|ds2] ,, 
# A single cent, either with dollar or euro.
[%0 1] -> jeden || _ [cs1|cs2] ,, 
# Remove the zero in cents, the 2digit format. We want the single digit.
%0 -> 0 || _ [NZDigit - 1] cp1|cp2 ,, 
# Translate those two currency parts, from tags to human readable strings, which are already commented in the previous definition.
ds1 -> dolar ,, 
ds2 -> euro ,, 
dp1 -> dolary ,, 
dp2 -> eura ,, 
with -> i ,, 
cs1 -> cent ,, # dollar zero comma zero one = one cent
cs2 -> cent ,, # euro zero comma zero one = one cent. In ENglish, cents doesn't deppend on context.
cp1 -> centy ,, # dollar zero comma fourty = fourty cents
cp2 -> centy ,, # dollar zero comma fourty = fourty cents. In English, cents doesn't deppend on context.
# And remove symbols, not needed in the output.
[dollar|eur|%,] -> 0 ; 

## We won't regex the output as this will be included in numbers.foma.
#regex 
#Currency .o. 
#Singular .o. 
#TagCurrency .o. 
#TranslateCurrency ; 
